Arkansas, session 2025, SB557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-4-203(b), concerning permits relating to
water pollution, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
(10)(A) The division may deny a permit relating to wastewater if
the applicant has a history of noncompliance with environmental regulations,
whether at the applicant's site or at any other permitted or unpermitted
facility in this state.
(B) Noncompliance with environmental regulations includes:
*JMB212*
03/21/2025 12:33:28 PM JMB212

SB557
(i) Noncompliance that is recorded on inspections or
other compliance activities performed by the division;
(ii) A demonstrated history by the applicant of
submitting incomplete or deficient permit application information;
(iii) All consent administrative orders issued by
the division against the applicant; and
(iv) Noncompliance of the applicant or any other
entity whose ownership includes individuals who own at least five percent
(5%) of the applicant and who own or have owned at least five percent (5%) of
any other entity that has a history of noncompliance with environmental
regulations.
(C) If an applicant has a history of noncompliance with
environmental regulations that includes five (5) or more events of
noncompliance with environmental regulations within the previous five (5)
years, the division shall deny the permit.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 8-4-203(d)(1), concerning notice of
application for a permit relating to water, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) When an application for the issuance of a new permit or a major
modification of an existing permit is filed with the division, the division
shall cause notice of the application to be published in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the proposed facility is to be
located and provide notification by mail to any resident or property owner
within the same zip code in which the proposed facility is to be located.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 8-4-203(m)(1)(B), concerning general
permits relating to water and notice of intent, is amended to read as
follows:
(B)(i) Facilities or sources eligible to construct or
operate under a general permit may obtain coverage by submitting a notice of
intent to the division.
(ii) The director may require a person who has been
granted coverage under a general permit to apply for and obtain an individual
permit.
(iii)(a) A notice of intent as described in
subdivision (m)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall include water courses and
03/21/2025 12:33:28 PM JMB212

SB557
wetlands and a certification that the applicant for a general permit is not
impacting waters of the United States or wetlands.
(b) If an applicant cannot certify as required
under subdivision (m)(1)(B)(iii)(a) of this section, the applicant shall
provide a copy of the Corps permit under Section 304 of the Clean Water Act,
as amended by 33 U.C.C. § 1344.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 8, Chapter 4, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add additional sections to read as follows:
8-4-235. Sewage or storm water emergency.
The Division of Environmental Quality shall establish a method to allow
local officials responding to a sewage or storm water emergency to have
immediate access to personnel of the division for technical support.

8-4-236. Prohibited discharge.
A retail developer or a permittee of this chapter shall not discharge:
(1) Into an ephemeral or intermittent stream or waterway;
(2) In any situation in which the normal course of discharge
shall result in accumulation of wastewater in areas outside of the stream or
waterway; or
(3) In any situation that results in an overflow into the
private property of another.














03/21/2025 12:33:28 PM JMB212